Wisconsin, session 2025, SB279.
do enact as follows:SB279,11Section 1. 165.981 of the statutes is created to read:SB279,2,32165.981 Grants for data-sharing platforms for law enforcement. (1) In 3this section, “law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.98 (1).SB279,2,54(2) The department of justice shall award grants to law enforcement agencies 5for the acquisition of a data-sharing platform.SB279,2,86(3) A law enforcement agency that receives a grant under sub. (2) shall use 7the grant funds to acquire a data-sharing platform to which all of the following 8apply:SB279,2,109(a) The platform is able to integrate data from common law enforcement 10systems on a real-time basis.SB279,2,1211(b) The platform is able to identify and eliminate redundant records in law 12enforcement systems.SB279,2,1513(c) The platform is able to provide advance, configurable search, analytics, 14and visualization capabilities that support common mission needs for law 15enforcement.SB279,2,1816(d) The platform allows law enforcement agencies to appropriately restrict 17access to information by data type, organization, roles, responsibilities, individual 18investigations, and other parameters.SB279,2,2019(e) The platform allows for secure, permission-controlled data integration and 20sharing among participating law enforcement agencies.SB279,2,2221(f) The platform is able to be accessed on various devices commonly used by 22law enforcement agencies.SB279,3,223(g) The platform has a demonstrated record of meeting or exceeding similar 1mission needs and the ability to reach full operational capability within 90 days of 2initiation.SB279,3,53(h) The platform allows for integration with existing law enforcement agency 4identity and access management solutions, such as single-sign-on and multifactor 5authentication.SB279,3,86(i) The platform is hosted in a secure environment that is compliant with 7Criminal Justice Information Services standards and that can scale to 8accommodate volume and velocity of law enforcement data needs.SB279,3,109(j) The platform is able to provide granular audit logging for all user 10interactions with data.SB279,3,1311(k) The platform is able to provide an open, interoperable architecture and 12business terms that ensure the law enforcement agency retains all rights to agency 13data.SB279,912714Section 9127. Nonstatutory provisions; Justice.SB279,3,1915(1) Grant funding. In the 2025-27 fiscal biennium, upon request by the 16department of justice, the joint committee on finance may supplement the 17appropriation under s. 20.455 (2) (a) with sufficient funds from s. 20.865 (4) (a), not 18to exceed $2,000,000 in each fiscal year, to implement the grant program under s. 19165.981.SB279,3,2020